Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2704.31
Sales or use tax paid in another state; credit given.

If any person who causes property or service to be brought into this state has already paid a tax in another state with respect to the sale or use of such property or service in an amount less than the tax imposed by sections 13-319, 13-2813, 77-2703, 77-27,142, and 77-6403, the provisions of subsection (2) of section 77-2703 shall apply, but at a rate measured by the difference only between the rate imposed by such sections and the rate by which the previous tax on the sale or use was computed. If such tax imposed and paid in such other state is equal to or more than the tax imposed by such sections, then no use tax shall be due in this state on such property if such other state, territory, or possession grants a reciprocal exclusion or exemption to similar transactions in this state.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 54;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 50;

Laws 1999, LB 34, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 55;

Laws 2002, LB 1085, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB472, § 12.